Washington statutes.
RCW 27.12.220

Rural, island, and intercounty rural districts—Budget for capital outlays—Accumulation of funds.

The trustees of any rural county library district, any island library district, or any intercounty rural library district may include in the annual budget of such district an item for the accumulation during such year of a specified sum of money to be expended in a future year for the acquisition, enlargement or improvement of real or personal property for library purposes.

[ 1982 c 123 s 10; 1947 c 22 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 8246a.]